Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.310

Dismissal of writ after one year—Notice—Exception.

In all cases where it shall appear from the answer of the garnishee that the garnishee was indebted to the defendant when the writ of garnishment was served, no controversion is pending, there has been no discharge or judgment against the garnishee entered, and one year has passed since the filing of the answer of the garnishee, the court, after ten days' notice in writing to the plaintiff, shall enter an order dismissing the writ of garnishment and discharging the garnishee: PROVIDED, That this provision shall have no effect if the cause of action between plaintiff and defendant is pending on the trial calendar, or if any party files an affidavit that the action is still pending.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1031; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 27. Formerly RCW 7.33.270.]